Hawaii statutes.
[§480E-1] Purpose. The purpose
of this chapter is to protect Hawaii consumers from persons who prey on
homeowners who face property foreclosures, liens, or encumbrances. Consumers
who face foreclosures, liens, or encumbrances are often in desperate financial
situations that can have severe adverse consequences for individuals and
families even if the consumers have significant equity in their residential
real property. The consumers' desperation makes them vulnerable to persons who
claim they can stop, prevent, or delay foreclosures, liens, or encumbrances.
Persons who make these claims often use the consumers' desperation to foster
unequal bargaining positions and withhold or misrepresent vital information and
details. As a result, consumers may be convinced to give up their real
property interests and valuable equity to these persons while receiving little
in return. Requiring full and complete disclosure of vital information will
better enable consumers to make informed decisions when dealing with persons
claiming to be able to stop foreclosures, liens, or encumbrances. This [chapter]
addresses possible misrepresentations by compelling persons who offer
assistance to fully and completely describe their services in written contracts
and gives the homeowners the right to cancel at any time before a distressed
property consultant has performed all services called for in a contract. [L
2008, c 137, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next